Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB275.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of January 10, 1968 (1967 P.L.925, No.417), referred to as the Legislative Officers and Employes Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 57. (a) In addition to any other duty imposed under any statute, rule, policy or guideline, the Chief Clerk of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and the comptroller of the House of Representatives shall publish quarterly a list of the following expenses of the Senate and House of Representatives on a publicly accessible Internet website:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) Per diems for each member of the Senate and House of Representatives.(2) Travel allowances and reimbursements.(3) Meals and lodging.(4) Equipment and furnishing control and inventory.(5) District office expenses.(6) Capitol office expenses.(7) Official expenses.(8) Special expenses.(9) Miscellaneous expenses of standing and special committees.(b) The following information shall be included on the list of expenses required under subsection (a):(1) The member or individual for whom the expense was submitted, paid and reimbursed.(2) The date the expense was incurred, submitted, paid and reimbursed.(3) The legislative purpose for the expense.(4) The account from which the expense was paid or reimbursed.(c) The list of expenses required under subsection (a) shall be in a format that is searchable by name, office, account, date and any other format authorized by:(1) For the Senate, the Senate Committee on Management Operations.(2) For the House of Representatives, the House Committee on Management Operations or the House Bipartisan Management Committee.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0275PN0484 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829